New York, session 2025-2026, A10617.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5-b of section 2852 of the education law, as 2 added by chapter 4 of the laws of 1998, is amended to read as follows: 3 5-b. If the board of regents returns a proposed charter to the charter 4 entity pursuant to the provisions of subdivision five-a of this section, 5 such charter entity shall reconsider the proposed charter, taking into 6 consideration the comments and recommendation of the board of regents. 7 Thereafter, the charter entity shall resubmit the proposed charter to 8 the board of regents with modifications, provided that the applicant 9 consents in writing to such modifications, resubmit the proposed charter 10 to the board of regents without modifications, or abandon the proposed 11 charter. The board of regents shall review each such resubmitted 12 proposed charter in accordance with the provisions of subdivision five-a 13 of this section; provided, however, that it shall be the duty of the 14 board of regents to approve and issue a proposed charter resubmitted by 15 the charter entity described in paragraph (b) of subdivision three of 16 section twenty-eight hundred fifty-one of this article within [thirty] 17 ninety days of the resubmission of such proposed charter or such 18 proposed charter shall be deemed approved and issued at the expiration 19 of such period. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15204-01-6